Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6580XS (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2229 Section 1. Section 256C.5, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. âPreschool budget enrollmentâ means : 3 (1) For school districts providing ten or more hours, but 4 less than fifteen hours, per week of instruction, the figure 5 that is equal to fifty percent of the actual enrollment of 6 eligible students in the preschool programming provided by 7 a school district approved to participate in the preschool 8 program on October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in 9 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 10 (2) For school districts providing fifteen or more hours, 11 but less than twenty hours, per week of instruction, the figure 12 that is equal to seventy percent of the actual enrollment of 13 eligible students in the preschool programming provided by 14 a school district approved to participate in the preschool 15 program on October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in 16 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 17 (3) For school districts providing twenty or more hours, 18 but less than twenty-five hours, per week of instruction, the 19 figure that is equal to eighty percent of the actual enrollment 20 of eligible students in the preschool programming provided by 21 a school district approved to participate in the preschool 22 program on October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in 23 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 24 (4) For school districts providing twenty-five or more 25 hours, but less than thirty hours, per week of instruction, the 26 figure that is equal to ninety percent of the actual enrollment 27 of eligible students in the preschool programming provided by 28 a school district approved to participate in the preschool 29 program on October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in 30 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 31 (5) For school districts providing thirty or more hours per 32 week of instruction, the figure that is equal to the actual 33 enrollment of eligible students in the preschool programming 34 provided by a school district approved to participate in the 35 -1- LSB 6580XS (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 2229 preschool program on October 1 of the base year, or the first 1 Monday in October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 2 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (3) For the school budget years year beginning on or after 5 July 1, 2025, and the school budget year beginning July 1, 6 2026, resident pupils eligible to enroll in kindergarten 7 through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic school for the 8 applicable school budget year shall be eligible to receive an 9 education savings account payment. 10 Sec. 3. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 11 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 12 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) For school budget years beginning 13 on or after July 1, 2027, resident pupils eligible to enroll 14 in kindergarten through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic 15 school for the applicable school budget year shall be eligible 16 to receive an education savings account payment if the pupilâs 17 household has an annual income less than or equal to four 18 hundred percent of the most recently revised poverty income 19 guidelines published by the United States department of health 20 and human services. 21 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 22 years beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 23